Oklahoma, session 2025, HB1676.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law not to be
codified in the Oklahoma Statutes reads as follows:
This act shall be known and may be cited as the "Kay Floyd SANE
Act".
SECTION 2. AMENDATORY Section 2, Chapter 343, O.S.L.
2023 (19 O.S. Supp. 2024, Section 215.41), is amended to read as
follows:
Section 215.41. Subject to availability of funding, there There
is established until October 1, 2025, within the District Attorneys
Council under the direction of the Executive Coordinator of the
District Attorneys Council, the position of Sexual Assault Nurse
Examiner (SANE) Statewide Coordinator. The Statewide Coordinator
shall oversee forensic medical examination training throughout the
ENGR. H. B. NO. 1676 Page 1

stat e, recruit and develop SANE professionals, create and expand
local Sexual Assault Nurse Examiner programs and Sexual Assault
Response Team programs throughout this state, and coordinate
payments from the Sexual Assault Examination Fund. The Sexual
Assault Nurse Examiner (SANE) Statewide Coordinator shall receive a
minimum annual salary of One Hundred Twenty-five Thousand Dollars
($125,000.00) and no more than One Hundred Forty Thousand Dollars
($140,000.00), paid from monies appropriated to the District
Attorneys Council.
SECTION 3. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.
Passed the House of Representatives the 12th day of March, 2025.


Presiding Officer of the House
of Representatives

Passed the Senate the ___ day of ___________, 2025.


Presiding Officer of the Senate






ENGR. H. B. NO. 1676 Page 2